West Virginia, session 2026, HB4497.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-2-47. College preparedness exam as condition of financial aid. (a) The State Board of Education shall develop and implement a college preparedness exam to be administered to all students at the tenth-grade level. (b) The board shall establish parameters for a "pass" or "fail" grade for this college preparedness exam. (c) Any student who receives a failing grade for this exam may be permitted to retake the exam after a reasonable time has passed, as determined by the board. (d) A successful passing grade for this exam shall be a prerequisite for receiving any publicly available financial aid for a student who attends a publicly funded college or university in this state. (e) The board may implement rules to carry out the provisions of this section.(f) This section shall become effective for the 2026/2027 school year.